Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 1 Investments

53-8-1.
Authorized investments; standard of care; deviation from will or other disposition; investments by personal representative who is a bank or trust company.

Unless otherwise expressly provided in the will, a personal representative shall be authorized to make those investments that are listed in Code Sections 53-8-2 and 53-8-3.

In making any other investments and in acquiring and retaining those investments and managing the property of the estate, the personal representative shall exercise the judgment and care, under the circumstances then prevailing, which persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income as well as the probable safety of their capital.

Within the limitations of the standard provided in subsection (b) of this Code section and considering individual investments as a part of an overall administrative strategy, a personal representative is authorized to acquire and retain every kind of property whether real, personal, or mixed, and every kind of investment, specifically including, but not by way of limitation, bonds, debentures, and other corporate obligations and stocks, preferred or common, which persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence acquire or retain for their own account; and within the limitations of such standard, a personal representative may retain property properly acquired, without limitation as to time and without regard to its suitability for original purchase.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed as restricting the power of a court of proper jurisdiction to permit a fiduciary to deviate from the terms of any will, agreement, or other disposition relating to the acquisition, investment, reinvestment, exchange, retention, sale, or management of fiduciary property.

A personal representative that is a bank or trust company shall not be precluded from acquiring and retaining securities of or other interests in an investment company or investment trust because the bank or trust company or an affiliate provides services to the investment company or investment trust as investment adviser, custodian, transfer agent, registrar, sponsor, distributor, manager, or otherwise and receives compensation for such services.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-8-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 41.

Law reviews.

For article, “Fiduciary Problems of the Executor and Trustee: Conflicts of Interest, Violations of Fiduciary Duties, Surcharge, and Other Remedies of Beneficiaries,” see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 187 (1972).

For note discussing the reintroduction in Georgia of the prudent investor rule, see 24 Mercer L. Rev. 513 (1973).

For article, “The Scope of Permissible Investments by Fiduciaries Under Georgia Law,” see 19 Ga. St. B.J. 6 (1982).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

53-8-2.
Real property.

A personal representative is authorized to invest estate funds in real property after first obtaining an order to that effect from the probate court or from the superior court. Service shall be made as provided in Chapter 11 of this title to the heirs of an intestate estate or the beneficiaries of a will. The court shall be authorized to grant the order immediately if the heirs or beneficiaries acknowledge service and consent to the petition or at any time after ten days after perfection of service.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-8-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For note discussing and comparing the prudent man rule and the legal list rule in trustee investment, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 530 (1964).

53-8-3.
Securities, obligations, and interest-bearing deposits.

A personal representative is authorized to invest estate funds in:

Bonds issued by any county or municipality of this state which have been validated as required by law for the validation of county and municipal bonds;

Bonds issued by any county board of education under Subpart 1 of Part 3 of Article 9 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 for the purpose of building and equipping schoolhouses, which bonds have been validated and confirmed as required under Part 1 of Article 2 of Chapter 82 of Title 36;

Bonds and other securities issued by this state or by the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia;

Bonds or other obligations issued by the United States government and bonds of any corporation created by an act of Congress, the bonds of which are guaranteed by the United States government as provided in Code Section 53-8-4; and

Interest-bearing deposits in any chartered state or national bank or trust company or savings and loan association located in this state to the extent the deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or comparable insurance.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-8-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For note discussing and comparing the prudent man rule and the legal list rule in trustee investment, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 530 (1964).

53-8-4.
Government obligations; standard of prudence; corporate fiduciaries.

Whenever by law or by an instrument or court order establishing a fiduciary relationship the personal representative is authorized, permitted, required, or directed to invest funds in direct and general obligations of the United States government, obligations unconditionally guaranteed by the United States government, or obligations of the agencies of the United States government enumerated in Code Section 53-8-3, the personal representative may invest in and hold such obligations either directly or in the form of securities or other interests in any open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as now or hereafter amended, so long as:

The portfolio of such investment company or investment trust is limited to such obligations and repurchase agreements fully collateralized by such obligations;

Such investment company or investment trust takes delivery of such collateral either directly or through an authorized custodian; and

Such investment company or investment trust is operated so as to provide a constant net asset value or price per share.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed as relieving any personal representative from any duty or liability a personal representative has under the standard of prudence set forth in Code Section 53-8-1.

The authority granted in this Code section shall be applicable notwithstanding that a corporate fiduciary or an affiliate of the corporate fiduciary provides services to the investment company or investment trust as investment adviser, custodian, transfer agent, registrar, sponsor, distributor, manager, or otherwise and receives compensation for such services.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-8-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-8-5.
Retention of property by personal representative; corporate fiduciaries.

Unless otherwise provided in the will, a personal representative is authorized to retain the property received by the personal representative on the creation of the estate, including, in the case of a corporate fiduciary, stock or other securities of its own issue, even though the property may not otherwise be a legal investment and a personal representative shall not be liable for such retention, except for gross neglect. In the case of corporate securities, a personal representative may likewise retain the securities into which the securities originally received are converted or which are derived therefrom as a result of merger, consolidation, stock dividends, splits, liquidations, and similar procedures; and a personal representative may exercise by purchase or otherwise any rights, warrants, or conversion features attaching to any such securities. This Code section applies to all property held by a personal representative on March 28, 1961, under estates previously created, except that it shall not relieve a personal representative from liability for loss which had already accrued on or before March 28, 1961.

In the case of a corporate fiduciary, the authority granted in subsection (a) of this Code section shall apply to the exchange or conversion of stock or securities of the corporate fiduciary’s own issue, whether or not any new stock or securities received in exchange therefor are substantially equivalent to those originally held; and such authority shall also apply to the continued retention of all new stock and securities resulting from merger, consolidation, stock dividends, splits, liquidations, and similar procedures and received by virtue of such conversion or exchange of stock or securities of the corporate fiduciary’s own issue, whether or not the stock or securities are substantially equivalent to those originally received by the fiduciary. The authority granted in subsection (a) of this Code section shall have reference, inter alia, to the exchange and continued retention of such stock or securities for stock or securities of any holding company which owns stock or other interests in one or more other corporations including the corporate fiduciary, whether the holding company is newly formed or already existing and whether or not any of the corporations owns assets identical or similar to the assets of or carries on businesses identical or similar to the corporation the stock or securities of which were previously received by the fiduciary; and any such authority shall apply regardless of whether any of the corporations has officers, directors, employees, agents, or trustees in common with the corporation the stock or securities of which were previously received by the fiduciary.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-8-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For note discussing and comparing the prudent man rule and the legal list rule in trustee investment, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 530 (1964).